Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.270

State of emergency—State militia or state patrol—Use in restoring order.

The governor may in his or her discretion order the state militia pursuant to chapter 38.08 RCW or the state patrol to assist local officials to restore order in the area described in the proclamation of a state of emergency.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5023; 1969 ex.s. c 186 s 9.]